Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 4. Supplemental Employee Benefits on Withdrawal from Social Security.

Sec. 39.30.150.
Contributions.

In place of contributions to the federal social security system that would have been required on behalf of an employee had the participating employer belonged to the social security system, the participating employer shall contribute an amount equal to 6.13 percent of the wages of the employee up to the taxable wage base then in effect in the social security system. This contribution shall be paid into an individual employee annuity account in the Department of Administration under the terms of the State of Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan. The department shall pay 6.13 percent of the wages of the employee up to the taxable wage base then in effect in the social security system into the individual employee annuity account established under this subsection. This wage reduction shall be treated as an employer contribution under 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2). All costs of establishing and administering the programs established under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

shall be paid from the contributions made to the individual employee annuity accounts under this section.

Employees of the division of marine transportation included in AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

through the process of collective bargaining under AS

39.35.680

(22)(D) may, under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement, utilize contributions made under (a) of this section on their behalf to offset the costs of inclusion in the public employees’ retirement system; however,

the state is placed under no obligation to continue making contributions under this section if the state resumes participation in the federal social security system;

the bargaining agreement must provide a mechanism for satisfying any residual liabilities that might exist if the state resumes participation in the federal social security system; and

funds contributed under (a) of this section on behalf of employees who are not covered by maritime union contracts may not be obligated or expended to pay any costs associated with the inclusion of marine transportation employees in AS

39.35.095

— 39.35.680.

An employee may voluntarily elect additional wage reductions to be paid into special individual employee benefit accounts in the Department of Administration. Money in these accounts may only be used to purchase benefits selected by the employee under the supplemental benefits plan established by the administrator.

History.

(§ 5 ch 58 SLA 1979; am §§ 2, 3 ch 135 SLA 1980; am §§ 16, 17 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 55 SLA 1988; am § 71 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in subsection (b), “AS

39.35.680

(22)(D)” was substituted for “AS

39.35.680

(21)(D)” to reflect the 2005 renumbering of AS 39.35.680(21).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on SSHB 252, from which ch. 55, SLA 1988 derives, see 1988 House Journal 2151-2153.

Sec. 39.30.151.
Administrator.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee is the administrator of the system.

History.

(§ 72 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.153.
Repayment of contributions.

Upon termination of employment the amount held on behalf of a terminating employee in the employee’s individual employee annuity account shall be paid to the employee under the terms of the State of Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan.

History.

(§ 39 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 1988)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 55, SLA 1988 provides that the amendments made to this section by ch. 55, SLA 1988 apply only “to contributions due the month after a determination is obtained that amendment of the plan in accordance with this Act will not adversely affect the deferral of taxes.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on SSHB 252, from which ch. 55, SLA 1988 derives, see 1988 House Journal 2151-2153.

Sec. 39.30.154.
Powers and duties of the administrator.

The administrator has the same powers and duties with regard to the plan as those set out in AS

14.25.003

and

14.25.004

.

History.

(§ 73 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 51 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.155.
Management and investment of fund.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board is the fiduciary of the fund and has the same powers and duties under this section in regard to the fund as are provided under AS

37.10.220

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 74 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental benefits system, see 2 AAC 37, art. 3.

Sec. 39.30.160.
Benefits.

The Department of Administration shall, in accordance with policies prescribed by regulations adopted by the commissioner, provide to employees for whom special individual employee benefit accounts are established under AS

39.30.150(c)

the following benefit options:

supplemental health benefits;

supplemental death benefits;

supplemental disability benefits; and

supplemental dependent care benefits.

An employee may select the types and amounts of supplemental benefits to be purchased with the money deposited in the employee’s special individual employee benefit accounts under AS

39.30.150

. The selection for employees described in AS

39.30.150(a)

must be from the benefit options listed in (a) of this section.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 1988.]

[Repealed, § 40 ch 146 SLA 1980.]

Regulations adopted by the commissioner implementing AS

39.30.150

and this section are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 5 ch 58 SLA 1979; am §§ 4, 5 ch 135 SLA 1980; am §§ 19 — 22, 40 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 4, 5, 9 ch 55 SLA 1988; am §§ 75 — 77 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 52, 53 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental benefits system, see 2 AAC 37, art. 3.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter of SSHB 252, from which ch. 55, SLA 1988 derives, see 1988 House Journal 2151-2153.

Sec. 39.30.162.
Safeguard of money.

Except as provided in the State of Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan, amounts held on behalf of, or payable to, an employee or other person who is or who might become eligible for benefits under the plan are not subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge of any kind, either voluntary or involuntary, before being received by the person entitled to the amount under the terms of the plan. An attempt to anticipate, alienate, sell, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber, charge, or otherwise dispose of a right to amounts held under the plan is void.

Except as provided in AS

09.38.065

, amounts held on behalf of, or payable to, an employee or other person who is or who might become eligible for benefits under the plan are exempt from garnishment, execution, or levy.

History.

(§ 6 ch 55 SLA 1988)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on SSHB 252, from which ch. 55, SLA 1988 derives, see 1988 House Journal 2151-2153.

Sec. 39.30.165.
Appeals.

A final decision made under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

is subject to appeal under AS 44.64.

History.

(§ 54 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.30.170.
Participation in program.

An employer may become a participating employer in the employee benefits program under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

, if

the employer participates as an employer in the public employees’ retirement system under AS 39.35; and

the employer

is eligible for membership in but has never elected to become a member of the federal social security system; or

withdraws from membership in the federal social security system.

In order to become a participating employer, the employer shall file a request with the commissioner. The request may be made only after adoption of a resolution by the legislative body of a municipality, if the employer is a municipality, or by the board of directors, if the employer is a public organization, and after approval of the resolution by the official required by law to approve the resolution. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the commissioner.

The commissioner shall approve the request if the commissioner finds that the employer has never participated in the federal social security system or has withdrawn from participation in the federal social security system.

The employer may begin participation as a participating employer covered by AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

on the date designated by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 135 SLA 1980; § 23 ch 146 SLA 1980)

Sec. 39.30.175.
Investment of benefit program receipts.

The board is the fiduciary of the mandatory receipts, under AS

39.30.150(a)

, of the employee benefits program established under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

and has the same powers and duties concerning the management and investment in regard to those receipts as are provided under AS

37.10.220

.

The board may provide a range of investment options and permit a participant or beneficiary of the program to exercise control over the assets in the individual employee annuity account established under AS

39.30.150(a)

. If the board offers investment options, and if a participant or beneficiary exercises control over the assets in the individual employee annuity account,

the participant or beneficiary is not considered a fiduciary for any reason on the basis of exercising that control; and

a person who is otherwise a fiduciary is not liable under this section for any loss, or by reason of any breach, that results from the individual’s exercise of control.

If the board is considering entering into a contract or modifying an existing contract concerning the management or investment of the mandatory receipts of the supplemental employee benefits program, the board shall consult with the commissioner of administration before making a decision on the issue.

The board shall develop a contingency plan that addresses the board’s response to possible future investment problems.

Except to the extent clearly set out in the terms of the plan document offered by the employer to the employee, the employer is not liable to the employee for investment losses if the prudent investment standard has been met.

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 14 ch 31 SLA 1992; am §§ 78, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.30.180.
Definitions.

In AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

,

“board” means the board of trustees of the Alaska Retirement Management Board established under AS

37.10.210

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Administration;

“participating employer” means

the State of Alaska; and

an employer

who is an employer as defined in AS

39.35.680

;

who has never participated in or has withdrawn from participation in the federal social security system; and

whose participation in the supplemental employee benefit program has been approved by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 135 SLA 1980; § 23 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 79 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as paragraph (3) and renumbered in 2005, at which time former paragraphs (1) and (2) were renumbered as (2) and (3).